Utah statutes.
73-18-24.    Search and rescue fee -- Amount -- Deposition.

(1)  In addition to the fee imposed under Section 73-18-7, there is imposed a search and rescue fee of 50 cents on each motorboat or sailboat required to pay the fee imposed under Subsection 73-18-7(2) to be registered or renewed under Section 73-18-7.

(2)  The fees imposed under this section shall be collected in the same manner and by the same agency designated to collect the fees imposed under this chapter.

(3)  The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the General Fund as dedicated credits for the Search and Rescue Financial Assistance Program created under Section 53-2-107.



Enacted by Chapter 281, 1997 General Session

